Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2504
Unauthorized act; violation; penalty.

Any domestic insurer who transacts any unauthorized act of insurance business as regulated by sections 44-2501 to 44-2504 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined not more than ten thousand dollars.

Laws 1973, LB 425, § 4.